Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 7 Jai Alai

41-7-1.
Operation of jai alai sports facilities.

Any person desiring to operate a facility for the exhibition of the Spanish sport called jai alai in the city of Newport may do so upon the compliance with the terms and provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1.

41-7-2.
“Sports facilities” and “frontons” defined.

The words “sports facilities” and “fronton” as used in this chapter mean a building or enclosure in which is provided a playing court with three (3) walls so designed and constructed for the playing of that sports game of ball as played in Spanish speaking countries, called jai alai or pelota.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1.

41-7-3.
Regulation of operations — Licensing.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing is hereby authorized to license jai alai in the city of Newport. The operation of a fronton shall be under the division’s supervision. The division is hereby authorized to issue rules and regulations for the supervision of the operations.

Any license granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the division and shall be subject to suspension or revocation for any cause which the division shall deem sufficient after giving the licensee a reasonable opportunity for a hearing at which he or she shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If any license is suspended or revoked, the division shall state the reasons for the suspension or revocation and cause an entry of the reasons to be made on the record books of the division.

Commencing July 1, 2003, the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall be prohibited to license jai alai in the city of Newport. Any license having been issued and in effect as of that date shall be null and void and any licensee shall be prohibited from operating thereunder; provided, however, that any entity having been issued a license to operate a jai alai fronton prior to July 1, 2003, and any successor in interest to such entity by reason of acquiring the stock or substantially all of the assets of such entity, shall be deemed a pari-mutuel licensee as defined in §

42-61.2-1

et seq., and a licensee as defined in §

41-11-1

et seq.; and provided further, any license to operate a jai alai fronton in effect with regard to a facility in Newport shall terminate and be of no further force or effect upon the commencement of the operation of video lottery games at a facility owned by Twin River-Tiverton located in the town of Tiverton.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing is hereby authorized to grant a pari-mutuel license to Twin River-Tiverton with respect to a facility owned by Twin River-Tiverton, located at the intersection of William S. Canning Boulevard and Stafford Road in the town of Tiverton, provided that the requirements of

R.I. Const., Art. VI, Sec. XXII

are met with respect to said facility, namely that: (1) The secretary of state certifies that the qualified voters of the state have approved authorizing a facility owned by Twin River-Tiverton, located at the intersection of William S. Canning Boulevard and Stafford Road in the town of Tiverton, to be licensed as a pari-mutuel facility and offer state-operated video lottery games and state-operated casino gaming, such as table games; and (2) The board of canvassers of the town of Tiverton certifies (or there is certified on its behalf) that the qualified electors of the town of Tiverton have approved authorizing a facility owned by Twin River-Tiverton, located at the intersection of William S. Canning Boulevard and Stafford Road in the town of Tiverton, to be licensed as a pari-mutuel facility and offer state-operated video lottery games and state-operated casino gaming, such as table games.

For purposes of this section, “Twin River-Tiverton” shall mean Twin River-Tiverton, LLC and/or the successor in interest thereto by reason of the acquisition of the stock, membership interests, or substantially all of the assets of such entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 11, § 19; P.L. 2016, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 6, § 1.

41-7-4.
Power and duties of the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

In addition to the other powers conferred upon the division of gaming and athletics licensing, the division shall carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to that end, the division may:

Personally or by agent, supervise and check the making of pari-mutuel pools and wagers and the distribution therefrom;

Fix and set the dates within which any fronton may be operated; provided, however, there shall be at least one hundred (100) days annually of the operation; and

Require any applicant for a permit to operate a fronton to file an application under oath setting forth:

The full name of the person, firm, corporation, or association, and if a corporation, the name of the state under which it is incorporated, as well as the names of the officers, directors, and stockholders of the corporation, and their places of residence, or if an association, the name and residence of the members of the association;

The exact location where it is desired to operate a fronton exhibiting the Spanish sport jai alai or pelota;

Whether or not the fronton is owned or leased, and if leased, the name, residence, and address of the owners or lessees, or if the owner or lessee be a corporation, the name and address of the officers, directors, and stockholders thereof;

A statement of the assets and liabilities of the person, firm, corporation, or association making application for the division permit;

Such other information as the division may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 150.

41-7-5.
Wagers and pari-mutuel pools permitted within enclosure of fronton.

Within the enclosure of any fronton licensed and conducted under this chapter but not elsewhere, wagering on the respective scores or points of the game of jai alai or pelota and the sale of pari-mutuel pools under such regulation as the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall prescribe, are hereby authorized and permitted, including, but not limited to, those forms of wagering known as daily double, perfecta, quinella, and trifecta.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1.

41-7-5.1.
Sale or purchase of twin double tickets.

The sale or purchase of twin double tickets or attempting to aid or abet in the sale or purchase of twin double tickets through solicitation of patrons attending, other than through pari-mutuel machines, is prohibited. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be denied admission to the fronton and may be prosecuted. Persons convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for up to one year or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 294, § 2.

41-7-6.
Tax on betting and licensee’s commission.

The commission of a licensee on pari-mutuel pools and wagers shall be twenty and one-half percent (201/2%) of the amount contributed thereto. After deducting the commission and the “breaks,” hereafter defined, a pari-mutuel pool shall be redistributed to the contributors. The licensee conducting events pursuant to this chapter shall pay a tax to the state of three percent (3%) of annual amounts contributed to mutuel pools up to eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) of total handle. The Rhode Island tax shall increase one-half of one percent (.5%) for the next incremental increase of two million dollars ($2,000,000), and one-half of one percent (.5%) for each incremental increase of one million dollars ($1,000,000), thereafter, in the total annual pool up to a maximum of five percent (5%). The licensee shall pay a tax of one percent (1%) of the pool to the city of Newport, and the tax administrator/collector or equivalent for the city of Newport shall assess and collect the taxes imposed by this section with respect to the city of Newport under such rules and regulations as he or she may prescribe. All taxes hereby imposed shall be due and payable at the close of each day’s activities, and any tax not paid upon demand of the tax administrator/collector shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum for the time of the demand. Failure to pay any tax upon demand shall be cause for revocation of a license.

Redistributions of funds otherwise distributable to the contributors to the pari-mutuel pools shall be a sum equal to the next lowest multiple of ten (10).

No distribution of a pari-mutuel pool shall be made of the odd cents of any sum otherwise distributable, which odd cents shall be known as the “breaks.”

The “breaks” shall be known as the difference between the amount contributed to a pari-mutuel pool and the total of the commission of the licensee and the sums actually redistributed to the contributors.

No person or corporation shall directly or indirectly purchase pari-mutuel tickets or participate in the purchase of any part of a pari-mutuel pool for another for hire or for any gratuity and no person shall purchase any part of a pari-mutuel pool through another, wherein he or she gives or pays directly or indirectly the other person anything of value, and any person violating this section shall be fined the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 412, § 1.

41-7-7.
Distribution of funds — Applicability of chapters 3 and 4 of this title.

All money mentioned in this chapter derived from taxes on wagers and pari-mutuel pools shall be disbursed by the state treasurer pursuant to chapter 4 of this title. Except as is inconsistent with this chapter, the provisions of chapters 3 and 4 of this title shall apply to the sport of jai alai.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 150.

41-7-8.
Tax on breaks — Distribution.

A tax is hereby levied upon every pari-mutuel pool conducted at the fronton for the exhibition of the Spanish ball game known as jai alai in Newport authorized by law so to do, equal to fifty percent (50%) of the “breaks” as defined in the above.

It shall be the duty of every fronton licensee to pay unto the state treasurer the tax hereby levied and the licensee shall be liable therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1.

41-7-9.
Leases of city properties.

The city of Newport is hereby authorized to enter into a lease of city property for a period not to exceed thirty-five (35) years with an application to the division of gaming and athletics licensing for a license to conduct jai alai.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 48, § 1.

41-7-10.
Licensing of concessionaires, vendors, pari-mutuel totalizator companies.

All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations desiring to operate any concession allied to any fronton, shall apply for a license to the division of racing and athletics, on such forms and in such a manner as prescribed by regulations. The division by regulations shall establish other occupational licensing for all employees of the concessions, all pari-mutuel employees, and all persons employed in any other capacity by the fronton management.

All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations employed by the fronton management in providing pari-mutuel totalizator computer services for pari-mutuel computations, shall apply for a license to the division upon such forms and in such manner as prescribed by regulations of the division. All employees of the pari-mutuel totalizator computer companies shall be licensed by the division on forms prescribed by regulations of the division.

In determining whether to grant a license pursuant to this section the division may require the applicant to submit information as to: financial standing and credit; moral character; criminal record, if any; previous employment; corporate, partnership, or association affiliations; ownership of personal assets; and such other information as it deems pertinent to the issuance of the license. The division may reject for good cause an application for a license, and it may suspend or revoke for good cause any license issued by it after a hearing held in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42; subject to further appeal procedures provided by §

41-2-3

.

Issuance of license and the payment of annual fees shall be the same in accordance with the following schedule:

Concessionaires and vendors$200 (2) Occupational license Player license10.00 Ball maker10.00 Player/manager10.00 Jai alai judge10.00 (3) Vendor or concessionaire employee10.00 (4) Pari-mutuel employees10.00 (5) Employees of fronton management10.00 (6) Pari-mutuel totalizator companies200 (7) Pari-mutuel totalizator company employees10.00 (8) Security employees10.00

All individual applicants for licensing under this section shall be fingerprinted, and, upon obtaining a license, shall wear upon his or her outer apparel a photo identification badge, issued or authorized by the division of racing and athletics under rules and regulations promulgated by the division.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 62, § 7.

41-7-11.
Conclusion of Saturday performances.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 6 of this title, any jai alai game played within the enclosure of any fronton licensed and conducted pursuant to this chapter, commencing on a Saturday evening and not concluded before twelve (12) o’clock midnight, shall not be permitted to be played beyond one o’clock in the morning of the first day of the week.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 188, § 1.

41-7-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 417, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 24, § 2, effective March 1, 1991.